New York, session 2025-2026, S9505.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to East 4 Fishkill veterans. All that portion of the state highway system consti- 5 tuting state route three hundred seventy-six, beginning at its inter- 6 section with state route eighty-two in the town of East Fishkill, county 7 of Dutchess, and continuing to its intersection with state route fifty- 8 two in the town of East Fishkill, county of Dutchess, shall be dedicated 9 to East Fishkill veterans. 10 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 11 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 12 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 13 signage shall state "Highway Dedicated to East Fishkill Veterans". 14 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 15 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 16 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway 17 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15144-01-6